Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3610
Member board; joint investigations; powers.

(a) Licensure and disciplinary records of physicians are deemed investigative.

(b) In addition to the authority granted to a member board by its respective medicine and surgery practice act or other applicable state law, a member board may participate with other member boards in joint investigations of physicians licensed by the member boards.

(c) A subpoena issued by a member state shall be enforceable in other member states.

(d) Member boards may share any investigative, litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or individual investigation initiated under the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact.

(e) Any member state may investigate actual or alleged violations of the statutes authorizing the practice of medicine in any other member state in which a physician holds a license to practice medicine.

Laws 2017, LB88, § 10.